Arkansas, session 2025, HB1660.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 18-13-102, concerning the definitions under
the Horizontal Property Act, is amended to add additional subdivisions to
read as follows:
(12) "Local government" means:
(A) A county;
(B) A city of the first class, a city of the second class,
or an unincorporated town; or
(C) Any other state entity or political subdivision of the
state or an agency, board, or commission of the state entity or political
subdivision of the state;
(13) "Property owners association" means an incorporated
nonprofit organization operating under recorded land agreements through which
each:
(A) Lot owner in a planned unit or other described land
*ANS259*
03/04/2025 10:09:39 AM ANS259

HB1660
area is automatically a member;
(B) Lot is automatically subject to a charge for a
proportionate share of the expenses for the organization's activities and
services; and
(C) Incorporated nonprofit organization has at least one
thousand (1,000) members; and
(14)(A) "Services traditionally performed by a local government"
means services provided to members of a property owners association.
(B) "Services traditionally performed by a local
government" includes without limitation:
(i) Road maintenance;
(ii) Sewer services;
(iii) Trash services; and
(iv) Water services.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 18-13-110 is amended to read as follows:
18-13-110. Book of receipts and expenditures — Examination — Annual
financial report — Audit.
(a) The administrator, the board of administration, or other form of
administration specified in the bylaws shall keep a book with a detailed
account, in chronological order, of the receipts and expenditures affecting
the building and its administration and specifying the maintenance and repair
expenses of the common elements and any other expenses incurred.
(b) Both the book and the vouchers accrediting the entries made
thereupon All financial records shall be available for examination by all the
co-owners at convenient hours on working days that shall be set and announced
for general knowledge.
(c)(1) A property owners association organized under this subchapter
may be subject to review by Arkansas Legislative Audit if the property owners
association provides services traditionally performed by a local government.
(2) A review under subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall be
conducted by Arkansas Legislative Audit only after approval by the
Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.
(3) This subsection does not limit the authority of the
Legislative Auditor to conduct an audit under § 10-4-401 et seq.

03/04/2025 10:09:39 AM ANS259